Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB347.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 230.210 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Advance deposit account wagering" means a form of pari-mutuel wagering in
which an individual may establish an account with a person or entity licensed by the
corporation, and may place a pari-mutuel wager through that account that is
permitted by law;
(2) "Advance deposit account wagering licensee" means a person or entity licensed by
the corporation to conduct advance deposit account wagering and accept deposits
and wagers, issue a receipt or other confirmation to the account holder evidencing
such deposits and wagers, and transfer credits and debits to and from accounts;
(3) "Amateur youth sporting event" means any sporting event in which an individual:
(a) Shall be less than eighteen (18) years of age to participate; and
(b) Is prohibited, as a condition of participating in the sporting event, from
receiving direct or indirect compensation for the use of the individual's
athletic skill in any manner with respect to the sport in which the particular
sporting event is conducted;
(4) "Appaloosa race" or "Appaloosa racing" means that form of horse racing in which
each horse participating in the race is registered with the Appaloosa Horse Club of
Moscow, Idaho, and is mounted by a jockey;
(5) "Arabian" means a horse that is registered with the Arabian Horse Registry of
Denver, Colorado;
(6) "Association" means any person licensed by the Kentucky Horse Racing and
Gaming Corporation under KRS 230.300 and engaged in the conduct of a
recognized horse race meeting;
(7) "Charitable gaming" means gaming licensed by the corporation on and after July 1,
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
2025, as authorized under this chapter and KRS Chapter 238;
(8) "Corporation" means the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation;
(9) "Geofence" means a virtual geographic boundary defined by Global Positioning
System (GPS) or Radio Frequency Identification (RFID) technology;
(10) "Harness race" or "harness racing" means trotting and pacing races of the
standardbred horses;
(11) "Horse race meeting" means horse racing run at an association licensed and
regulated by the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation, and may include
Thoroughbred, harness, Appaloosa, Arabian, paint, and quarter horse racing;
(12) "Host track" means the track conducting racing and offering its racing for intertrack
wagering, or, in the case of interstate wagering, means the Kentucky track
conducting racing and offering simulcasts of races conducted in other states or
foreign countries;
(13) "Interstate wagering" means pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse races from a
track located in another state or foreign country by patrons at a receiving track or
simulcast facility;
(14) "Intertrack wagering" means pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast horse races from a
host track by patrons at a receiving track;
(15) "Kentucky paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian purse fund" means a purse fund
established to receive funds as specified in KRS 230.3771 for purse programs
established in KRS 230.446 to supplement purses for paint horse, Appaloosa, and
Arabian horse races. The purse program shall be administered by the Kentucky
Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation;
(16) "Kentucky quarter horse purse fund" means a purse fund established to receive
funds as specified in KRS 230.3771 for purse programs established in KRS 230.407
to supplement purses for quarter horse races. The purse program shall be
administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation;
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
(17) "Kentucky resident" means:
(a) An individual domiciled within this state;
(b) An individual who maintains a place of abode in this state and spends, in the
aggregate, more than one hundred eighty-three (183) days of the calendar year
in this state; or
(c) An individual who lists a Kentucky address as his or her principal place of
residence when applying for an account to participate in advance deposit
account wagering;
(18) "Licensed facility for sports wagering" means the designated areas to conduct
sports wagering for a track licensed to conduct sports wagering pursuant to KRS
230.811;
(19) "Licensed premises" means a track or simulcast facility licensed by the corporation
under this chapter;
(20) "Paint horse" means a horse registered with the American Paint Horse Association
of Fort Worth, Texas;
(21) "Pari-mutuel wagering," "pari-mutuel system of wagering," or "mutuel wagering"
each means any method of wagering previously or hereafter approved by the
corporation in which one (1) or more patrons wager on a horse race or races,
whether live, simulcast, or previously run. Wagers shall be placed in one (1) or
more wagering pools, and wagers on different races or sets of races may be pooled
together. Patrons may establish odds or payouts, and winning patrons share in
amounts wagered including any carryover amounts, plus any amounts provided by
an association less any deductions required, as approved by the corporation and
permitted by law. Pools may be paid out incrementally over time as approved by
the corporation;
(22) "Person" means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, association,
fiduciary, corporation, limited liability company, or any other business entity;
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
(23) "President" means the president of the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming
Corporation, who shall serve as chief executive officer of the corporation;
(24) "Principal" means any of the following individuals associated with a partnership,
trust, association, limited liability company, or corporation that is licensed to
conduct a horse race meeting or an applicant for a license to conduct a horse race
meeting:
(a) The chairman and all members of the board of directors of a corporation;
(b) All partners of a partnership and all participating members of a limited
liability company;
(c) All trustees and trust beneficiaries of an association;
(d) The president or chief executive officer and all other officers, managers, and
employees who have policymaking or fiduciary responsibility within the
organization;
(e) All stockholders or other individuals who own, hold, or control, either directly
or indirectly, five percent (5%) or more of stock or financial interest in the
collective organization; and
(f) Any other employee, agent, guardian, personal representative, or lender or
holder of indebtedness who has the power to exercise a significant influence
over the applicant's or licensee's operation;
(25) "Proof of wagers" includes any paper, card, certificate, token, or ticket, which
indicates the details of one (1) or more pari-mutuel wagers that were placed and, if
such wagers are successful, that winnings are due to the ticket holder from the
track;
(26) "Quarter horse" means a horse that is registered with the American Quarter Horse
Association of Amarillo, Texas;
(27) "Receiving track" means a track where simulcasts are displayed for wagering
purposes. A track that submits an application for intertrack wagering shall meet all
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
the regulatory criteria for granting an association license of the same breed as the
host track, and shall have a heated and air-conditioned facility that meets all state
and local life safety code requirements and seats a number of patrons at least equal
to the average daily attendance for intertrack wagering on the requested breed in the
county in which the track is located during the immediately preceding calendar
year. If a receiving track has allowed an outside person or facility to display its
simulcasts through an agreement pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of Section 5 of
this Act, the receiving track shall still be deemed the responsible party for any
simulcast excise taxes or simulcast agreements with any host track;
(28) "Simulcast facility" means any facility approved pursuant to KRS 230.380 to
simulcast live racing and conduct pari-mutuel wagering on live racing or races
previously run;
(29) "Simulcasting" means the telecast of live audio and visual signals of horse races for
the purpose of pari-mutuel wagering;
(30) "Sporting event" means an event at which two (2) or more persons participate in
athletic contests, or an event that takes place in relation to athletic contests as
approved by the corporation, but shall not include horse racing or amateur youth
sports or athletic events in which the majority of participants are under the age of
eighteen (18) years;
(31) "Sports governing body" means the organization, league, or association that
oversees a sport, prescribes final rules, and enforces codes of conduct with respect
to such sport and participants therein;
(32) "Sports wagering" means the wagering conducted under this chapter on sporting
events or portions of sporting events, or on the individual performance statistics of
athletes in a sporting event or combination of sporting events, in conformance with
federal law and as authorized by the corporation pursuant to this chapter;
(33) "Sports wagering device":
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
(a) Means a mechanical, electrical, or computerized contrivance, terminal,
device, apparatus, software, piece of equipment, or supply approved by the
corporation for conducting sports wagering under this chapter; and
(b) Includes a personal computer, mobile device, or other device used in
connection with sports wagering not conducted at a licensed facility for sports
wagering;
(34) "Sports wagering service provider" or "service provider" means a person authorized
to conduct or manage sports wagering through an agreement with a track and
provide these services at a licensed facility for sports wagering, simulcast facility,
or through a website or mobile interface approved by the corporation;
(35) "Telephone account wagering" means a form of pari-mutuel wagering where an
individual may deposit money in an account at a track and may place a wager by
direct telephone call or by communication through other electronic media owned by
the holder of the account to the track;
(36) "Thoroughbred race" or "Thoroughbred racing" means a form of horse racing in
which each horse participating in the race is a Thoroughbred, (i.e., meeting the
requirements of and registered with The Jockey Club of New York) and is mounted
by a jockey;
(37) "Track" means any association duly licensed by the Kentucky Horse Racing and
Gaming Corporation to conduct horse racing and includes:
(a) For facilities in operation as of 2010, the location and physical plant described
in the "Commonwealth of Kentucky Initial/Renewal Application for License
to Conduct Live Horse Racing, Simulcasting, and Pari-Mutuel Wagering,"
filed for racing to be conducted in 2010;
(b) Real property of an association, if the association received or receives
approval from the corporation after 2010 for a location at which live racing is
to be conducted; or
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
(c) One (1) facility or real property that is:
1. Owned, leased, or purchased by an association within a sixty (60) mile
radius of the association's racetrack but not contiguous to racetrack
premises, upon corporation approval; and
2. Not within a sixty (60) mile radius of another licensed track premise
where live racing is conducted and not within a forty (40) mile radius of
a simulcast facility, unless any affected track or simulcast facility agrees
in writing to permit a noncontiguous facility within the protected
geographic area;
(38) "Unclaimed pari-mutuel winning ticket":
(a) Means the proof of wager that would require payment of winnings upon
submission to the track, but has been presumed abandoned under KRS
230.361; and
(b) Includes proof of wagers from live racing and simulcasting; and
(39) "Unredeemed pari-mutuel voucher":
(a) Means a voucher issued by a licensed track that evidences the value of funds
or credits available that a patron may use for placing pari-mutuel wagers on
live or previously run horse races, or which the patron may redeem for cash,
but has been presumed abandoned under KRS 230.361; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Any proof of wagers or any other information related to specific wagers
placed on live or historical horse racing; or
2. Any vouchers that were voluntarily surrendered for donation to charity
or similar purposes.
Section 2. KRS 230.361 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The corporation may promulgate administrative regulations governing and
regulating mutuel wagering on horse races under what is known as the pari-
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
mutuel system of wagering.
(b) The wagering shall be conducted only by a person licensed under this chapter
to conduct a race meeting and only upon the licensed premises or by a person
licensed under subsection (1)(b) of Section 5 of this Act,[ and] provided[
further] that only pari-mutuel wagering on simulcasting or races previously
run shall be allowed at simulcast facilities.
(c) The pari-mutuel system of wagering shall be operated only by a totalizator or
other mechanical equipment approved by the corporation. The corporation
shall not require any particular make of equipment.
(2) The corporation may promulgate administrative regulations governing and
regulating sports wagering, including administrative regulations for the deposit of
funds by credit or debit cards or other means of electronic funds transfer. The
corporation may promulgate administrative regulations to establish a fully
functioning sports wagering system within six (6) months after June 29, 2023.
(3) The operation of a pari-mutuel system for betting, or the conduct of sports
wagering, where authorized by law shall not constitute grounds for the revocation
or suspension of any license issued and held under KRS 242.1238 and 243.265.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:
(a) The corporation may promulgate administrative regulations governing all
reported but unclaimed pari-mutuel winning tickets and unredeemed pari-
mutuel vouchers held in this state by any person or association operating a
pari-mutuel or similar system of betting authorized under this chapter; and
(b) The unclaimed pari-mutuel winning tickets and unredeemed pari-mutuel
vouchers shall be presumed abandoned if not claimed by the person entitled to
them within one (1) year from the time the ticket was issued.
(5) The corporation may issue a license to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on steeple
chases or other racing over jumps; if all proceeds from the wagering, after expenses
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
are deducted, is used for charitable purposes. If the dates requested for such a
license have been granted to a track within a forty (40) mile radius of the race site,
the corporation shall not issue a license until it has received written approval from
the affected track. Pari-mutuel wagering licensed and approved under this
subsection shall be limited to four (4) days per year. All racing and wagering
authorized by this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with applicable
administrative regulations promulgated by the corporation.
Section 3. KRS 230.3615 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission, including the tax levied in KRS 138.510, deducted from the gross
amount wagered by the association which operates a race track under the
jurisdiction of the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation and conducts
the Thoroughbred racing at which betting is conducted through a pari-mutuel or
other similar system, in races where the patron is required to select one (1) horse,
and the breaks, which breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny, except on
races previously run in which the breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny
or retained in the pari-mutuel pools, shall not be more than seventeen and one-half
percent (17.5%).
(2) The commission, including the tax levied in KRS 138.510, deducted from the gross
amount wagered by the person, corporation, or association which operates a race
track under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation
and conducts Thoroughbred racing at which betting is conducted through a pari-
mutuel or other similar system shall not exceed twenty-two percent (22%) of the
gross handle in races where the patron is required to select two (2) or more horses,
and the breaks, which breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny, except on
races previously run in which the breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny
or retained in the pari-mutuel pools.
(3) The minimum wager to be accepted by any licensed association or simulcast
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
facility shall be ten cents ($0.10). The minimum pay-off on a one dollar ($1) wager
shall be one dollar and ten cents ($1.10); but, in the event of a minus pool, the
minimum pay-off for a one dollar ($1) wager shall be one dollar and five cents
($1.05).
(4) Each association conducting Thoroughbred racing shall pay to the corporation all
moneys allocated to the backside improvement fund in an amount equal to one-half
of one percent (0.5%) of its on-track pari-mutuel wagers.
Section 4. KRS 230.378 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A receiving track may accept wagers only at the track where it is licensed to
conduct its race meeting or conduct intertrack wagering or at a facility it has
established through an agreement pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of Section 5 of
this Act. A receiving track may accept wagers through a telephone account
wagering system. Wagers at a receiving track, simulcast facility, or on telephone
account wagering shall form a common pool with wagers at a host track. This
common pool requirement shall not apply to wagers made in connection with
interstate simulcasting pursuant to KRS 230.3771; however, common pools shall be
encouraged.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 230.3771(2), the commission of a receiving track,
simulcast facility, or on telephone account wagering shall be the same as the
commission of the host track as determined in KRS 230.3615 or 230.750.
(3) In the absence of a valid contract with a horsemen's organization, the commission
of a receiving track, after deduction of applicable taxes and other applicable
deductions, shall be split as follows: twenty-two percent (22%) to the host track,
twenty-two percent (22%) to the purse program at the host track, twenty-two
percent (22%) to the receiving track and twenty-two percent (22%) to the purse
program at the receiving track. Twelve percent (12%) of the commission shall be
allocated evenly between the host track and the receiving track to cover the cost of
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
simulcasting, unless otherwise agreed to by contract.
(4) The deduction for the backside improvement fund, as provided for in KRS
230.3615(4) shall not apply to the commission or pari-mutuel tax of a receiving
track or telephone account wagering.
(5) A receiving track shall be exempt from any license fee imposed by statute or
administrative regulation by the corporation.
Section 5. KRS 230.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any track licensed by the corporation to conduct horse racing and desiring to
establish a simulcast facility shall apply for and may receive approval from
the corporation for each simulcast facility. Prior to considering an application
for approval of a simulcast facility, the corporation shall notify by regular
mail, each state senator, state representative, county judge/executive, and
mayor in the jurisdiction in which the proposed simulcast facility is located, at
least ten (10) days in advance of the corporation meeting at which the
application is to be considered or voted upon. Consideration of an application
shall be based on criteria contained in administrative regulations promulgated
under KRS 230.300. Approval, if granted, shall be granted for a term of one
(1) calendar year.
(b) 1. Any track licensed by the corporation that chooses not to establish a
simulcast facility may transfer its ability to establish one (1) simulcast
facility to another person.
2. a. i. Any person that enters into an agreement with a track to
establish a simulcast facility shall file an application
following the procedure required in paragraph (a) of this
subsection and a license to operate a simulcast facility shall
be issued to the person upon approval.
ii. The agreement between the track and the simulcast facility
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
shall establish how the percentage in subsection (9)(a) of
this section is divided.
b. Consideration of an application shall be based on criteria
contained in administrative regulations promulgated by the
corporation.
(2) A track or tracks or person may proceed with the establishment of a simulcast
facility unless, within sixty (60) days of the date on which the corporation approved
the facility, the governing body of the local government jurisdiction in which the
facility is to be located votes, by simple majority of those voting, to disapprove the
establishment of the simulcast facility. For the purposes of this section, "governing
body" means, in an incorporated area, the board of aldermen, city council or board
of commissioners; in a county, the fiscal court; in an urban-county government, the
urban-county council, or in a charter county, the legislative body created in
accordance with KRS 67.825 to 67.875.
(3) The corporation shall not approve the establishment of any simulcast facility within
a radius of forty (40)[fifty (50)] miles of a licensed track. The corporation may
approve the establishment of one (1) simulcast facility within a radius of greater
than forty (40)[fifty (50)] miles but less than seventy-five (75) miles of a licensed
track, but the facility shall not be approved to operate without the prior written
consent of the licensed track within whose seventy-five (75) mile radius the facility
is located.
(4) The corporation may promulgate administrative regulations as it deems appropriate
to protect the integrity of pari-mutuel wagering at any simulcast facility.
(5) Licensed tracks conducting horse racing may enter into joint agreements to
establish or operate one (1) or more simulcast facilities, on terms and conditions as
the participating tracks may determine. Any agreements respecting these
arrangements shall be filed with the corporation, and applications for simulcast
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
facilities shall be filed by and licenses may be issued to, these licensed tracks by the
corporation.
(6) A simulcast facility may be established and operated on property that is owned or
leased and which is not used solely for the operation of a simulcast facility;
provided however, that a simulcast facility may not be established on the premises
of a lottery vendor.
(7) A simulcast facility shall not be subject to and shall not pay any excise tax imposed
pursuant to KRS 138.510, or any license tax imposed under KRS 137.170.
(8) One percent (1%) of all moneys wagered at a simulcast facility shall be dedicated
for local economic development and shall be allocated as follows:
(a) If a simulcast facility is located in an incorporated area, seventy-five percent
(75%) shall be allocated to the governing body of the city in which the facility
is located, and twenty-five percent (25%) to the governing body of the county
in which the facility is located.
(b) If a simulcast facility is located in an unincorporated area, all moneys shall be
allocated to the governing body of the county or charter county in which the
facility is located.
(9) (a) After the deduction of moneys under subsection (8) of this section, a
simulcast facility shall deduct a commission allowed under KRS 230.3615
with respect to all wagers made at the simulcast facility. The commission, less
moneys allocated in subsection (8) of this section, shall be split as follows:
1. Thirty percent (30%) shall be allocated to the host track;
2. Forty-six and one-half percent (46.5%) to the purse program at the host
track;
3. Thirteen and one-half percent (13.5%) to be retained by the track or
tracks or person owning the simulcast facility for the purpose of
application to expenses incurred in connection therewith;
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1109
4. Six percent (6%) to be allocated to the Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners
and Breeders, Inc., to be expended as follows:
a. Up to three percent (3%) for capital improvements and promotion
of off-track betting; and
b. The remainder for marketing and promoting the Kentucky
Thoroughbred industry; and
5. Four percent (4%) to be allocated to the corporation to be used for
purses at county fairs in Kentucky licensed and approved by the
corporation, and for the standardbred sires stakes program established
under KRS 230.770.
(b) The commission of a simulcast facility derived from interstate wagering shall
be reduced by any amounts required to be paid by contract to the host track or
track conducting the live race before it is divided as set forth in this section.
No simulcast facility may receive any interstate simulcast except with the
approval of the live Kentucky host track.
(c) The Kentucky Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders, Inc., shall annually report
to the corporation on all money expended in accordance with subsection
(9)(a)4. of this section. The report shall be in the form required, and provide
all information required by the corporation.
(10) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall also apply to the establishment by a
track of a noncontiguous facility in a county in which pari-mutuel racing and
wagering is not being conducted. Subsection (8) of this section shall also apply to a
noncontiguous race track facility referenced in this subsection, unless there is a
written agreement to the contrary between the track establishing the facility and the
governing body of the local government jurisdiction in which the facility is to be
established.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 1/12/2026 5:31 PM Jacketed